Illinois, session 104th, SB1366.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the State 5Government AI Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Agency of State government" means:8        (1) any agency, department, or office in State 9    government or any part of State government created by the 10    Constitution of the State;11        (2) any of the several agencies and departments of 12    State government as designated in Section 5-15 of the 13    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois; or14        (3) any State agency, department, bureau, or office in 15    the executive branch or legislative branch created by 16    statute or executive order that does not exist as a 17    constituent part of an agency, department, or office 18    described under item (i) or item (ii) of this definition.19    "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means technology that 20enables computers and machines to simulate human learning, 21comprehension, problem solving, decision making, creativity, 22and autonomy.   SB1366- 2 -LRB104 06501 BDA 16537 b1    Section 10. Policies and procedures. Before January 1, 22028, the Department of Innovation and Technology shall adopt 3rules establishing policies and procedures concerning the 4development, procurement, deployment, use, and assessment of 5artificial intelligence by agencies of State government to 6protect and enhance the health, welfare, and safety of the 7people of the State of Illinois. In developing these rules, 8the Department of Innovation and Technology may consult with 9the Generative AI and Natural Language Processing Task Force 10established under Section 1-80 of the Department of Innovation 11and Technology Act. 12    Section 15. Prohibition. Beginning January 1, 2028, unless 13permitted by rules adopted by the Department of Innovation and 14Technology, no agency of State government may deploy or use 15artificial intelligence. 16    Section 20. Impact assessment reports.17    (a) On or before July 1, 2028, and on or before July 1 of 18every succeeding calendar year, every agency of State 19government shall submit an impact assessment report on the 20impact of artificial intelligence on that agency of State 21government to the Department of Innovation and Technology.22    (b) On or before January 1, 2029, and on or before January 231 of every succeeding calendar year, the Department of 24Innovation and Technology shall submit an impact assessment   SB1366- 3 -LRB104 06501 BDA 16537 b1report on the impact of artificial intelligence on State 2government to the General Assembly and the Governor. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.